Texas statutes.
ESTATES CODE

TITLE 2. ESTATES OF DECEDENTS; DURABLE POWERS OF ATTORNEY

SUBTITLE F. WILLS

CHAPTER 253. CHANGE AND REVOCATION OF WILLS

Sec. 253.001. COURT MAY NOT PROHIBIT CHANGING OR REVOKING A WILL. (a) Notwithstanding Section 22.007(a), in this section, "court" means a constitutional county court, district court, or statutory county court, including a statutory probate court.

(b) A court may not prohibit a person from:

(1) executing a new will;

(2) executing a codicil to an existing will; or

(3) revoking an existing will or codicil in whole or in part.

(c) Any portion of a court order that purports to prohibit a person from engaging in an action described by Subsection (b) is void and may be disregarded without penalty or sanction of any kind.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680 (H.B. 2502), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1136 (H.B. 2912), Sec. 20, eff. January 1, 2014.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 949 (S.B. 995), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 949 (S.B. 995), Sec. 16, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 253.002. REVOCATION OF WILL. A written will, or a clause or devise in a written will, may not be revoked, except by a subsequent will, codicil, or declaration in writing that is executed with like formalities, or by the testator destroying or canceling the same, or causing it to be destroyed or canceled in the testator's presence.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680 (H.B. 2502), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.